Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-910
Filing false reports with regulatory bodies; penalty.

(1) Any firm or corporation operating a public utility in this state which shall file with any regulatory body, whether state or municipal, under any statute, order, resolution, or ordinance lawfully passed, any report or reports containing false statements, knowing the same to be false, affecting directly or indirectly, the value of its investment or the rate of return or earnings or expenditures of such public utility shall be guilty of filing false reports with regulatory bodies.

(2) Filing false reports with regulatory bodies is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 195.